src/app/lib/typo_js/tests/dictionaries/la/la.aff
SFX P o arim o # actif perfectum personnel subjonctif parfait contracté
SFX P o arimque o 
SFX P o arimne o 
SFX P o arimve o 
SFX P o avissem o # actif perfectum personnel subjonctif pqp
SFX P o avissemque o 
SFX P o avissemne o 
SFX P o avissemve o 
SFX P o avisses o 
SFX P o avissesque o 
SFX P o avissesne o 
SFX P o avissesve o 
SFX P o avisset o 
SFX P o avissetque o 
SFX P o avissetne o 
SFX P o avissetve o 
SFX P o avissemus o 
SFX P o avissemusque o 
SFX P o avissemusne o 
SFX P o avissemusve o 
SFX P o avissetis o 
SFX P o avissetisque o 
SFX P o avissetisne o 
SFX P o avissetisve o 
SFX P o avissent o 
SFX P o avissentque o 
SFX P o avissentne o 
SFX P o avissentve o 
SFX P o assem o # actif perfectum personnel subjonctif pqp contracté
SFX P o assemque o 
SFX P o assemne o 
SFX P o assemve o 
SFX P o asses o 
SFX P o assesque o 
SFX P o assesne o 
SFX P o assesve o 
SFX P o asset o 
SFX P o assetque o 
SFX P o assetne o 
SFX P o assetve o 
SFX P o assemus o 
SFX P o assemusque o 
SFX P o assemusne o 
SFX P o assemusve o 
SFX P o assetis o 
SFX P o assetisque o 
SFX P o assetisne o 
SFX P o assetisve o 
SFX P o assent o 
SFX P o assentque o 
SFX P o assentne o 
SFX P o assentve o 
SFX P o avisse o # actif perfectum impersonnel infinitif
SFX P o avisseque o 
SFX P o avissene o 
SFX P o avisseve o 
SFX P o asse o # actif perfectum impersonnel infinitif contracté
SFX P o asseque o 
SFX P o assene o 
SFX P o asseve o 
