src/app/lib/typo_js/tests/dictionaries/la/la.dic
abhorrui/P
abieci/P
abolevi/P
abrasi/P
abscessi/P
abscidi/P
absolvi/P
absorbui/P
abstinui/P
abstraxi/P
abstuli/P
absumpsi/P
accendi/P
accepi/P
accessi/P
accidi/P
accrevi/P
accurri/P
acquisivi/P
acui/Pq
adauxi/P
addidi/P
adduxi/P
adegi/P
ademi/P
adfui/P
adhibui/P
adiacui/P
adieci/P
adinveni/P
adiunxi/P
adiuvi/P
admiscui/P
admisi/P
admonevi/P
admovi/P
adnexui/P
adpendi/P
adpinxi/P
adquisivi/P
adscripsi/P
adsequi/P
adstruxi/P
adtigi/P
adtraxi/P
adtribui/P
adveni/P
adverti/P
aequepependi/P
affeci/P
agnovi/P
allexi/P
alui/P
ambii/P
amisi/P
amovi/P
animadverti/P
annexui/P
antecessi/P
anteposui/P
aperui/P
apparui/P
appendi/P
appetivi/P
applausi/P
apposui/P
apprehendi/P
arbitratus/P
arcui/Pq
arefeci/P
argui/P
arripui/P
arrisi/P
arsi/P
ascendi/P
ascripsi/P
aspersi/P
assensi/P
assequi/P
asserui/P
assuevi/P
assumpsi/P
astruxi/P
attendi/P
attigi/P
attraxi/P
attribui/P
attrivi/P
attuli/P
audivi/P
auxi/P
averti/P
beavi/P
calefeci/P
callui/P
candui/P
capessivi/P
careui/P
carpsi/P
cavi/P
cecidi/P
cecini/P
censui/P
cepi/P
cessi/P
circumdedi/P
circumduxi/P
circumegi/P
circumflexi/P
circumfudi/P
circumposui/P
circumscripsi/P
circumsepsi/P
circumsteti/P
circumtuli/P
circumveni/P
circumvolvi/P
circundedi/P
civi/P
clarui/P
clausi/P
coalui/P
coargui/P
coassumpsi/P
coegi/P
coercui/P
cognovi/P
cohaesi/P
cohibui/P
collegi/P
collisi/P
colui/P
combussi/P
comminui/P
commiscui/P
commovi/P
comperi/P
competivi/P
complevi/P
composui/P
comprehendi/P
compressi/P
compuli/P
concalefeci/P
concepi/P
concessi/P
concidi/P
conclusi/P
concurri/P
concussi/P
condidi/P
conduxi/P
conexui/P
confeci/P
confinxi/P
confixi/P
conflixi/P
confluxi/P
confudi/P
congessi/P
congrui/P
conieci/P
coniunxi/P
connexui/P
conprehendi/P
conquievi/P
conscripsi/P
consensi/P
consolatus/P
consonui/P
conspexi/P
constiti/P
constitui/P
construxi/P
consuevi/P
consui/P
consului/P
consumpsi/P
consurrexi/P
contempsi/P
contendi/P
contexui/P
contigi/P
continui/P
contradixi/P
contraxi/P
contrivi/P
contuli/P
convalui/P
conveni/P
converti/P
convestivi/P
convici/P
convolvi/P
correxi/P
corripui/P
corrosi/P
corrui/P
corrupi/P
coxi/P
credidi/P
crevi/P
cucurri/P
cudi/P
cupii/P
cupivi/P
debui/P
decepi/P
decerpsi/P
decessi/P
decrevi/P
decubui/P
decurri/P
dedi/P
deduxi/P
defeci/P
definivi/P
deflexi/P
defluxi/P
defui/P
deieci/P
delegi/P
deliniavi/P
delitui/P
demersi/P
deminui/P
demisi/P
dempsi/P
demulsi/P
dependi/P
depinxi/P
deprehendi/P
deprendi/P
depressi/P
deprompsi/P
desaevii/P
descendi/P
descripsi/P
desecui/P
deserui/P
desii/P
destiti/P
destitui/P
destruxi/P
desumpsi/P
detexi/P
detorsi/P
detraxi/P
detrusi/P
detuli/P
deveni/P
devolvi/P
didici/P
diffinivi/P
diffudi/P
digessi/P
dignovi/P
dilexi/P
dimisi/P
dimovi/P
diremi/P
direxi/P
discessi/P
discidi/P
discrevi/P
discurri/P
discussi/P
disieci/P
disiunxi/P
dispescui/P
dispexi/P
disposui/P
dispuli/P
dissecui/P
dissedi/P
disserui/P
distinxi/P
distiti/P
distraxi/P
distribui/P
distuli/P
diverti/P
divisi/P
dixi/P
docui/P
dolui/P
duxi/P
edidi/P
edi/P
eduxi/P
effeci/P
effinxi/P
effluxi/P
effudi/P
egeui/P
egi/P
eieci/P
elegi/P
elicui/P
elisi/P
elusi/P
emersi/P
eminui/P
emisi/P
emunxi/P
erexi/P
eripui/P
erubui/P
erupi/P
evanui/P
evasi/P
eveni/P
everti/P
evolvi/P
excandui/P
excellui/P
excepi/P
excerpsi/P
excessi/P
excidi/P
exclusi/P
excrevi/P
excudi/P
excussi/P
exegi/P
exemi/P
exercui/P
exhausi/P
exhibui/P
exilui/P
expedivi/P
expensi/P
expetivi/P
explausi/P
explevi/P
explicui/P
expoposci/P
exposui/P
expressi/P
expui/P
expuli/P
expunxi/P
exquisivi/P
exstiti/P
extendi/P
extiti/P
extraxi/P
extruxi/P
extuli/P
exurrexi/P
exusi/P
feci/P
fefelli/P
fidi/P
finivi/P
finxi/P
fixi/P
flevi/P
flexi/P
fovi/P
fregi/P
fugi/P
fui/P
fulsi/P
garrivi/P
gavisus/P
genui/P
gessi/P
habui/P
hausi/P
horrui/P
iacui/P
ici/P
ieci/P
ignivi/P
ignovi/P
illisi/P
illuxi/P
immersi/P
immisi/P
impartivi/P
impedivi/P
impertivi/P
implevi/P
imposui/P
impressi/P
impuli/P
incendi/P
incepi/P
incessi/P
incidi/P
inclusi/P
incubui/P
incurri/P
incussi/P
indidi/P
indigui/P
indixi/P
indui/P
induxi/P
infixi/P
inflexi/P
influxi/P
infudi/P
infui/P
ingenui/P
ingessi/P
inhaesi/P
inieci/P
innotui/P
innui/P
inquisivi/P
inscripsi/P
insculpsi/P
insedi/P
inserui/P
inservivi/P
insonui/P
inspexi/P
institi/P
institui/P
instruxi/P
intellexi/P
intendi/P
intercepi/P
intercessi/P
intercidi/P
interclusi/P
interemi/P
interfui/P
interieci/P
intermiscui/P
intermisi/P
internovi/P
interposui/P
interscripsi/P
interscui/P
intersevi/P
interveni/P
intexi/P
intexui/P
intremui/P
introduxi/P
intrusi/P
intuli/P
invasi/P
inveni/P
inverti/P
involvi/P
irrupi/P
iunxi/P
iussi/P
iuvi/P
lacessivi/P
langui/P
lascivii/P
latui/P
legi/P
licui/P
loqui/P
lusi/P
madui/P
malui/P
mansi/P
merui/P
metui/P
minui/P
miscui/P
misi/P
monui/P
movi/P
munivi/P
neglexi/P
nescivi/P
nexui/P
niti/P
nocui/P
nolui/P
notui/P
novi/P
nutrivi/P
obfui/P
obieci/P
obrui/P
obsedi/P
obstiti/P
obtinui/P
obtudi/P
obtuli/P
occidi/P
occlusi/P
occului/P
occurri/P
offendi/P
offundi/P
omisi/P
opposui/P
ostendi/P
parsi/P
partivi/P
parui/P
parvipependi/P
patui/P
pependi/P
peperci/P
peperi/P
pepuli/P
percepi/P
percucurri/P
percussi/P
perdidici/P
perdidi/P
peregi/P
peremi/P
perfeci/P
perfluxi/P
perhibui/P
perii/P
perivi/P
permansi/P
permeavi/P
permisi/P
perpendi/P
perpolivi/P
perquisivi/P
personui/P
perspexi/P
perstiti/P
perstrepui/P
perstrinxi/P
persuasi/P
pertinui/P
pertraxi/P
pertuli/P
perveni/P
perverti/P
petivi/P
pinsui/P
placui/P
poenitui/P
polivi/P
poposci/P
porrexi/P
possedi/P
posthabui/P
postposui/P
posui/P
potui/P
praebui/P
praececini/P
praecepi/P
praecessi/P
praedixi/P
praefeci/P
praefui/P
praemisi/P
praeposui/P
praeripui/P
praesagivi/P
praescripsi/P
praestiti/P
praestruxi/P
praetermisi/P
praeveni/P
prehendi/P
pressi/P
processi/P
procidi/P
procudi/P
procurri/P
prodidi/P
produxi/P
profeci/P
profluxi/P
profudi/P
profui/P
progenui/P
prohibui/P
proieci/P
promerui/P
promisi/P
promovi/P
prompsi/P
proposui/P
propuli/P
prosecui/P
prosilui/P
protendi/P
protraxi/P
protuli/P
proveni/P
provexi/P
providi/P
pudui/P
quaesivi/P
quievi/P
rapui/P
rarefeci/P
recensui/P
recepi/P
recessi/P
recidi/P
recognovi/P
recollegi/P
recolui/P
recussi/P
reddidi/P
redegi/P
reduxi/P
reflexi/P
refregi/P
refudi/P
refugi/P
reieci/P
reliqui/P
remansi/P
remisi/P
removi/P
repercussi/P
reperi/P
repetii/P
repetivi/P
replevi/P
reposui/P
repperi/P
reprehendi/P
repsi/P
repuli/P
requisivi/P
resarsi/P
rescripsi/P
resecui/P
resedi/P
resolvi/P
respexi/P
respondi/P
respui/P
resteti/P
restitui/P
restrinxi/P
retinui/P
retrocessi/P
rettuli/P
retudi/P
retuli/P
reverti/P
revisi/P
revivixi/P
revixi/P
revolvi/P
rexi/P
risgui/P
risi/P
rubescui/P
rupi/P
saepsi/P
saeptum/P
salui/P
satisfeci/P
scandi/P
scidi/P
scivi/P
scripsi/P
secesssi/P
seclusi/P
secrevi/P
secui/P
sedi/P
seiunxi/P
selegi/P
sensi/P
servivi/P
sivi/P
solvi/P
sonui/P
sparsi/P
sprevi/P
stabilivi/P
statui/P
steti/P
stiti/P
stravi/P
strinxi/P
struxi/P
stupui/P
subduxi/P
subfui/P
subiacui/P
subieci/P
subiunxi/P
subscripsi/P
subsedi/P
subsilui/P
substitui/P
subtendi/P
subtexui/P
subtraxi/P
subtuli/P
succendi/P
succensui/P
successi/P
succurri/P
suevi/P
suffeci/P
sumpsi/P
superfui/P
superposui/P
supertexui/P
superveni/P
suppetivi/P
supplevi/P
supposui/P
surrexi/P
suscepi/P
suspendi/P
suspexi/P
sustinui/P
tacui/P
tenui/P
tersi/P
tetendi/P
tetigi/P
texi/P
torsi/P
tradidi/P
traduxi/P
traieci/P
transcripsi/P
transmisi/P
transparui/P
transposui/P
transtuli/P
transvexi/P
traxi/P
tremefeci/P
tremui/P
tribui/P
trivi/P
tuli/P
ursi/P
valui/P
veni/P
verti/P
vestivi/P
vetui/P
vexi/P
vici/P
vidi/P
virui/P
vivi/P
vixi/P
volui/P
volvi/P
vulsi/P
